Hawaii statutes.
§53-22 Governmental advances, donations,
and other appropriations. (a) The governor shall submit to the
legislature at each regular session in an odd-numbered year, estimates of the
amount reasonably required in the governor's judgment for administrative
expenses and overhead of agencies concerned with the administration of this
part, together with other amounts deemed necessary by the governor for state
contributions for redevelopment projects, for the succeeding fiscal biennium,
so that the legislature may make appropriations therefor if it deems the action
advisable.

(b) Any county within which a redevelopment
project is located or is about to be located may from time to time make loans,
donations, or advances to the local redevelopment agency of such sums as in its
discretion it may determine, the loans, advances, or donations to be made for
the purpose of aiding or cooperating in the prosecution of the redevelopment
project. The local agency, when it has money available therefor, shall
reimburse the county for all advances made by way of a loan to it. For the
purpose of raising funds for donation to an agency, any county within which a
redevelopment project is located may issue and sell its bonds. Any bonds to be
issued by the county pursuant to this section shall be issued in the manner and
within the limitation prescribed by the laws of the State for the issuance and
authorization of bonds for public purposes generally.

(c) In order to qualify for the allotment and
expenditure of funds appropriated by the State under this section, for any
redevelopment project or for assistance to a local redevelopment agency, the
county shall make funds available to the agency in amounts at least equal to
the funds granted or contributed, or to be granted or contributed, by the
State. The council may make funds available for any of the purposes (including
studies by the planning commission to determine and recommend for redevelopment
blighted areas, and other activities of the planning commission under this part)
of this part (whether or not state funds shall be available for any of such
purposes) out of any moneys in the general fund of the county, and may include
necessary amounts therefor in determining the real property tax rate for the
county. The amount which, pursuant to this subsection, is included in
determining the real property tax rate for the county, shall be paid into the
redevelopment fund of the county for expenditure by the agency for the purposes
of this part.

(d) All state appropriations made under this
section shall be allocated to the respective redevelopment agencies upon the
basis of actual need therefor, or as otherwise provided by law.

(e) The governor shall submit to the
legislature at each regular session in an odd-numbered year, estimates of the
amount of additional appropriation necessary in the governor's judgment for use
by the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation in the succeeding
fiscal biennium, in providing living facilities necessary to care for families
displaced or to be displaced by redevelopment projects, so that the legislature
may make appropriations therefor if it deems the action advisable. [L 1949, c
379, §5; am L 1951, c 244, §4; am L 1955, c 271, §1(j); RL 1955, §143-21; am L
Sp 1957, c 1, §15(b); am L Sp 1959 1st, c 13, §2; am L 1963, c 142, §10 and c
193, §39; HRS §53-22; am L 1979, c 105, §8; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 337,
§5(3); am L 1997, c 350, §14; am L 2005, c 196, §26(b); am L 2006, c 180, §16]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next